California, session 20252026, SB1228.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5440.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5440.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Sections 5440 and 5443 do not apply to an advertising display developed within the boundary limits of, and as a part of, an individual redevelopment agency project, as those boundaries existed on December 29, 2011, and that has been in place and operating as of December 31, 2025, under a tracking number issued by the department for an advertising display exempted under Section 5273, 5273.1, or 5273.5. An advertising display subject to this subdivision shall remain in the same location where it existed on December 31, 2025, and shall not be expanded, increased in height or display area, or modified to add additional display panels, beyond what existed on December 31, 2025.(b) An advertising display described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed a placement requiring a new permit and shall comply with all the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 5400).